Illinois, session 104th, HB1770.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.80 new)7    Sec. 356z.80. Genetic, rare, and unique conditions; 8medically necessary treatment. 9    (a) An insurance policy amended, delivered, issued, or 10renewed in this State on or after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall provide 12coverage for medically necessary treatments for genetic, rare, 13unknown or unnamed, and unique conditions, including 14Ehlers-Danlos syndrome and altered drug metabolism.15    (b) For an insurance policy that provides coverage for 16prescription drugs, the coverage required under subsection (a) 17shall include coverage for opioid alternatives, coverage for 18medicines included in the most recent Model List of Essential 19Medicines published by the World Health Organization, and 20coverage for custom-made medications and medical food.21    (c) An insurance policy that limits the quantity of a 22medication in accordance with applicable State and federal law 23shall not require pre-approval for the treatment of patients   HB1770- 2 -LRB104 08714 BAB 18768 b1with rare metabolism conditions that may need a higher dose of 2medication than what is otherwise allowed within a time frame 3or prescription schedule.4    (d) The burden of proving that treatment is medically 5necessary shall not lie with the insured in cases of 6rejections for filing claims, preauthorization requests, and 7appeals related to coverage required under this Section.